dict/kk_KZ.aff
# Kazakh affix file, generated by tools/gen_aff.py — do not edit by hand.
#
# Suffix shape is decided by two things: vowel harmony, from the last vowel of
# the stem, and the stem's final segment. Both are settled once per entry and
# recorded in its flags, so no rule below has to re-derive them from a fixed
# window of the stem — which is what limited the 2009 file to stems with a
# vowel in the last two characters.
#
# Level one attaches the first morpheme and hands off a continuation flag.
# Level two carries the whole remainder of the chain as one string, so a form
# of any suffix depth still costs Hunspell only the two levels it strips.

SET UTF-8
FLAG num

TRY аеқыңғұрстізөүлйбоюпшнмәһджхцвчфъьэё

WORDCHARS -'’

# The pairs a Kazakh typist actually confuses: each letter Cyrillic added for
# Kazakh against its nearest Russian neighbour, which is what a keyboard left
# on the Russian layout produces.
MAP 8
MAP аә
MAP оө
MAP уұү
MAP ыі
MAP иі
MAP кқ
MAP гғ
MAP нң

# Same substitutions as an edit the suggester can undo, in the direction the
# mistake is made: the Russian letter was typed, the Kazakh one was meant.
REP 8
REP а ә
REP о ө
REP у ү
REP у ұ
REP и і
REP к қ
REP г ғ
REP н ң

# Level one: the first morpheme, keyed on the stem's class.

SFX 10 N 74
SFX 10 0 а .
SFX 10 0 ба/102 .
SFX 10 0 байды/103 .
SFX 10 0 бақ/104 .
SFX 10 0 бек/105 .
SFX 10 0 бын/106 .
SFX 10 0 да/107 .
SFX 10 0 дай/108 .
SFX 10 0 дан .
SFX 10 0 дағы/112 .
SFX 10 0 дегі .
SFX 10 0 й/117 .
SFX 10 0 йды/118 .
SFX 10 0 йтын .
SFX 10 0 л/119 .
SFX 10 0 лар/120 .
SFX 10 0 лары/121 .
SFX 10 0 лау/122 .
SFX 10 0 лы/123 .
SFX 10 0 лық/124 .
SFX 10 0 лік .
SFX 10 0 м/125 .
SFX 10 0 ма/126 .
SFX 10 0 май/127 .
SFX 10 0 мақ .
SFX 10 0 мен .
SFX 10 0 мыз/128 .
SFX 10 0 мын .
SFX 10 0 на/129 .
SFX 10 0 нда/130 .
SFX 10 0 ндағы/131 .
SFX 10 0 ншы/132 .
SFX 10 0 ны/133 .
SFX 10 0 ның .
SFX 10 0 нікі .
SFX 10 0 п/134 .
SFX 10 0 пақ .
SFX 10 0 пты/135 .
SFX 10 0 р/136 .
SFX 10 0 рақ/137 .
SFX 10 0 рек/138 .
SFX 10 0 с/139 .
SFX 10 0 са/140 .
SFX 10 0 сақ .
SFX 10 0 саң .
SFX 10 0 сы/141 .
SFX 10 0 сыз/142 .
SFX 10 0 сыздар/143 .
SFX 10 0 сың/144 .
SFX 10 0 сыңдар .
SFX 10 0 т/145 .
SFX 10 0 тын/153 .
SFX 10 0 тыр/154 .
SFX 10 0 у/156 .
SFX 10 0 ушы/157 .
SFX 10 0 ша/158 .
SFX 10 0 шы/159 .
SFX 10 0 ші/160 .
SFX 10 0 ы .
SFX 10 0 ыл/162 .
SFX 10 0 ым/163 .
SFX 10 0 ын/165 .
SFX 10 0 ып .
SFX 10 0 ың/170 .
SFX 10 0 і/172 .
SFX 10 0 ін/175 .
SFX 10 0 ға/177 .
SFX 10 0 ған .
SFX 10 0 ғы/178 .
SFX 10 0 ғыз/179 .
SFX 10 0 қ .
SFX 10 0 ң/181 .
SFX 10 0 ңа/182 .
SFX 10 0 ңыз/183 .

SFX 11 N 58
SFX 11 0 а/100 .
SFX 11 0 ады/101 .
SFX 11 0 ба/102 .
SFX 11 0 байды/103 .
SFX 11 0 бақ .
SFX 11 0 да/107 .
SFX 11 0 дай/108 .
SFX 11 0 дан .
SFX 11 0 дағы/112 .
SFX 11 0 ды .
SFX 11 0 дыр/114 .
SFX 11 0 дың .
SFX 11 0 дікі .
SFX 11 0 л/119 .
SFX 11 0 лар/120 .
SFX 11 0 лары/121 .
SFX 11 0 лау/122 .
SFX 11 0 лы/123 .
SFX 11 0 лық/124 .
SFX 11 0 лік .
SFX 11 0 м/125 .
SFX 11 0 май .
SFX 11 0 мақ .
SFX 11 0 мен .
SFX 11 0 мыз .
SFX 11 0 мын .
SFX 11 0 пақ .
SFX 11 0 р/136 .
SFX 11 0 рақ/137 .
SFX 11 0 с .
SFX 11 0 са/140 .
SFX 11 0 сақ .
SFX 11 0 саң .
SFX 11 0 сы/141 .
SFX 11 0 сыз/142 .
SFX 11 0 сың .
SFX 11 0 тын .
SFX 11 0 у/156 .
SFX 11 0 ша/158 .
SFX 11 0 шы/159 .
SFX 11 0 ы/161 .
SFX 11 0 ыл/162 .
SFX 11 0 ым/163 .
SFX 11 0 ымыз/164 .
SFX 11 0 ын/165 .
SFX 11 0 ып/166 .
SFX 11 0 ыпты/167 .
SFX 11 0 ырақ .
SFX 11 0 ыс/169 .
SFX 11 0 ың/170 .
SFX 11 0 ыңыз/171 .
SFX 11 0 і .
SFX 11 0 ін/175 .
SFX 11 0 ға/177 .
SFX 11 0 ған .
SFX 11 0 ғы/178 .
SFX 11 0 ғыз .
SFX 11 0 қан .

SFX 12 N 52
SFX 12 0 а/100 .
SFX 12 0 ады/101 .
SFX 12 0 атын .
SFX 12 0 ба/102 .
SFX 12 0 байды/103 .
SFX 12 0 бақ/104 .
SFX 12 0 бен .
SFX 12 0 бын .
SFX 12 0 да/107 .
SFX 12 0 дай/108 .
SFX 12 0 дан .
SFX 12 0 дар/109 .
SFX 12 0 дары/110 .
SFX 12 0 дау/111 .
SFX 12 0 дағы/112 .
SFX 12 0 дегі .
SFX 12 0 ды/113 .
SFX 12 0 дыр/114 .
SFX 12 0 дық/115 .
SFX 12 0 дың .
SFX 12 0 дік .
SFX 12 0 еді .
SFX 12 0 май .
SFX 12 0 мен .
SFX 12 0 мыз .
SFX 12 0 мын .
SFX 12 0 са/140 .
SFX 12 0 сы/141 .
SFX 12 0 сыз/142 .
SFX 12 0 сың .
SFX 12 0 тын .
SFX 12 0 тыр/154 .
SFX 12 0 у/156 .
SFX 12 0 ша/158 .
SFX 12 0 шы/159 .
SFX 12 0 ы/161 .
SFX 12 0 ыл/162 .
SFX 12 0 ым/163 .
SFX 12 0 ымыз/164 .
SFX 12 0 ын/165 .
SFX 12 0 ып/166 .
SFX 12 0 ыпты .
SFX 12 0 ырақ .
SFX 12 0 ыс/169 .
SFX 12 0 ың/170 .
SFX 12 0 ыңыз/171 .
SFX 12 0 і .
SFX 12 0 ін .
SFX 12 0 ға/177 .
SFX 12 0 ған .
SFX 12 0 ғы/178 .
SFX 12 0 ғыз/179 .

SFX 13 N 49
SFX 13 0 а/100 .
SFX 13 0 ады/101 .
SFX 13 0 атын .
SFX 13 0 ба/102 .
SFX 13 0 байды/103 .
SFX 13 0 бақ .
SFX 13 0 да/107 .
SFX 13 0 дай/108 .
SFX 13 0 дар/109 .
SFX 13 0 дары/110 .
SFX 13 0 дау/111 .
SFX 13 0 дағы/112 .
SFX 13 0 ды/113 .
SFX 13 0 дыр/114 .
SFX 13 0 дық/115 .
SFX 13 0 дік .
SFX 13 0 дікі .
SFX 13 0 е/116 .
SFX 13 0 еді .
SFX 13 0 мен .
SFX 13 0 мын .
SFX 13 0 нан .
SFX 13 0 ның .
SFX 13 0 пақ .
SFX 13 0 са/140 .
SFX 13 0 сақ .
SFX 13 0 сы/141 .
SFX 13 0 сыз/142 .
SFX 13 0 сыздар/143 .
SFX 13 0 сың .
SFX 13 0 тын .
SFX 13 0 у/156 .
SFX 13 0 ша/158 .
SFX 13 0 шы/159 .
SFX 13 0 ы/161 .
SFX 13 0 ыл/162 .
SFX 13 0 ым/163 .
SFX 13 0 ымыз/164 .
SFX 13 0 ын/165 .
SFX 13 0 ып .
SFX 13 0 ырақ/168 .
SFX 13 0 ыс/169 .
SFX 13 0 ың/170 .
SFX 13 0 ыңыз/171 .
SFX 13 0 і .
SFX 13 0 ға/177 .
SFX 13 0 ған .
SFX 13 0 ғы/178 .
SFX 13 0 ғыз .

SFX 14 N 76
SFX 14 0 а/100 .
SFX 14 0 ады .
SFX 14 0 атын .
SFX 14 0 ба/102 .
SFX 14 0 байды/103 .
SFX 14 0 май .
SFX 14 0 пақ .
SFX 14 0 пен .
SFX 14 0 пын .
SFX 14 0 са/140 .
SFX 14 0 сақ .
SFX 14 0 саң .
SFX 14 0 се .
SFX 14 0 сы/141 .
SFX 14 0 сыз/142 .
SFX 14 0 сыздар .
SFX 14 0 сың .
SFX 14 0 сіз .
SFX 14 0 та/146 .
SFX 14 0 тай/147 .
SFX 14 0 тан .
SFX 14 0 тар/148 .
SFX 14 0 тары/149 .
SFX 14 0 тау/150 .
SFX 14 0 тағы/151 .
SFX 14 0 тегі .
SFX 14 0 ты/152 .
SFX 14 0 тын .
SFX 14 0 тыр/154 .
SFX 14 0 тық/155 .
SFX 14 0 тың .
SFX 14 0 тік .
SFX 14 0 тікі .
SFX 14 0 у/156 .
SFX 14 0 ушы/157 .
SFX 14 0 ша/158 .
SFX 14 0 ше .
SFX 14 0 шы/159 .
SFX 14 0 ші/160 .
SFX 14 0 ы/161 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ыл/162 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ым/163 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ымыз/164 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ын/165 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ып/166 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ырақ/168 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ыс/169 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ың/170 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 ыңыз/171 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 і/172 [^кпқ]
SFX 14 0 іл/173 .
SFX 14 0 ім/174 .
SFX 14 0 ін/175 .
SFX 14 0 ің/176 .
SFX 14 0 ғы .
SFX 14 0 қа/180 .
SFX 14 0 қан .
SFX 14 к гы .
SFX 14 к гым/184 .
SFX 14 к гі .
SFX 14 п бы/185 .
SFX 14 п был/186 .
SFX 14 п бым/187 .
SFX 14 п бын/188 .
SFX 14 п бырақ .
SFX 14 п быс/189 .
SFX 14 п бың/190 .
SFX 14 қ ғы/191 .
SFX 14 қ ғыл .
SFX 14 қ ғым/192 .
SFX 14 қ ғымыз/193 .
SFX 14 қ ғын/194 .
SFX 14 қ ғып .
SFX 14 қ ғырақ .
SFX 14 қ ғың/195 .
SFX 14 қ ғыңыз/196 .

SFX 15 N 63
SFX 15 0 бе/197 .
SFX 15 0 бек .
SFX 15 0 бін/199 .
SFX 15 0 ге/200 .
SFX 15 0 ген .
SFX 15 0 гі/201 .
SFX 15 0 гіз/202 .
SFX 15 0 дағы .
SFX 15 0 де/203 .
SFX 15 0 дегі/204 .
SFX 15 0 дей/205 .
SFX 15 0 ден .
SFX 15 0 етін .
SFX 15 0 й/214 .
SFX 15 0 йді/215 .
SFX 15 0 йтін .
SFX 15 0 к .
SFX 15 0 кен/217 .
SFX 15 0 л/218 .
SFX 15 0 лер/219 .
SFX 15 0 лері/220 .
SFX 15 0 леу/221 .
SFX 15 0 лық .
SFX 15 0 лі/222 .
SFX 15 0 лік/223 .
SFX 15 0 м/224 .
SFX 15 0 ме/225 .
SFX 15 0 мей .
SFX 15 0 мейді .
SFX 15 0 мен .
SFX 15 0 міз/227 .
SFX 15 0 мін .
SFX 15 0 нде/228 .
SFX 15 0 ндегі .
SFX 15 0 не/229 .
SFX 15 0 нші/230 .
SFX 15 0 ні/231 .
SFX 15 0 нікі/232 .
SFX 15 0 нің .
SFX 15 0 п/233 .
SFX 15 0 пті/235 .
SFX 15 0 р/236 .
SFX 15 0 рек/237 .
SFX 15 0 с/238 .
SFX 15 0 се/239 .
SFX 15 0 сек .
SFX 15 0 сең .
SFX 15 0 сы/240 .
SFX 15 0 сі/241 .
SFX 15 0 сіз/242 .
SFX 15 0 сің/244 .
SFX 15 0 т/245 .
SFX 15 0 тін/254 .
SFX 15 0 тір/255 .
SFX 15 0 у/256 .
SFX 15 0 ше/257 .
SFX 15 0 ші/258 .
SFX 15 0 і .
SFX 15 0 ім .
SFX 15 0 ін/263 .
SFX 15 0 ң/270 .
SFX 15 0 ңе/271 .
SFX 15 0 ңіз/272 .
