dict/kk_KZ.dic
агломерация/10
адал/12
адиантум/13
азықбулауыш/14
айбындандыру/11
айганша/10
айлашыл/12
айтабан/13
алакөбе/15
алал/12
алауан/13
алаштану/11
алағандалық/14
алтыңызға/10
алысқан/13
алғал/12
амортизатор/11
анорак/14
антигистамин/13
антонимдерді/15
аоа/10
аргинин/13
арнасыз/12
арындау/11
арығ/14
ассимиляциялан/13
астеносфера/10
атпақыл/12
атұлтан/13
аудандастыр/11
аудандык/14
афина/10
ахалтеке/15
ацетофенон/13
аярсу/11
ағайсенов/14
ақарал/12
ақим/13
ақымдау/11
аңдауымша/10
бабахан/13
базарбасылық/14
байымдал/12
балаусалан/13
балаңдау/11
балықкесіртке/15
баржық/14
баротравма/10
баршын/13
басқауыл/12
баторий/11
баяндамасының/13
бағыныш/14
бақынды/10
бейнебақылау/11
беклері/15
беріле/15
бесерман/13
беторамал/12
бимұрат/14
бозақыр/11
бойсәкі/15
болатком/13
бомази/10
босат/14,24
бостандықшыл/12
буалдыр/11
бытпың/13
бірауық/14
бірге/15
бү/15
бүтінде/15,25
бұзар/11
бұзұшды/10
бұлтарыссыз/12
бәдауй/11
бәшере/15
бөлімшесі/15
варияциялық/14
велярлан/13
веялка/10
витаминді/15
вокал/12
геотоп/14
гетеро/10
гиадтар/11
гиперорексия/15
гирудин/13
гол/12
гуя/10
гүлбараш/14
данай/11
дарыған/13
дауыссыз/12
деменция/15
денитрификация/10
диатомит/14
диграммалар/11
доңғал/12
дсұ/10
дункан/13
дыңқаттау/11
дүлейле/15
дұздық/14
ебдіді/15
елбелекте/15
ергүрді/15
есентай/11
еснеді/15
етмал/12
жабыншы/10
жадағайлан/13
жазылмыш/14
жайпақтау/11
жамбыл/12
жанашыр/11
жанболат/14
жанқаста/10
жарықдері/15
жасаман/13
жасандылау/11
жатық/14,24
жатьімсыз/12
жаққыздыру/11
жеңіске/15
жинақсыздық/14
жинақтаушы/10
жойымпаз/12
жолшыбай/11
жортаң/13
жырбақай/11
жыңғылбас/14
жұмшыл/12
жәлила/10
жәмилә/15
замбар/11
заққум/13
зийад/14
зәһрә/15
иамлатты/10
иағмұршыл/12
ивановский/11
иероглиф/14
иман/13
индия/10
инфекция/15
иттартыс/14
иықылсұнлар/11
иұвұшды/10
иұмұз/12
канадиан/13
кассалық/14
кастірөңке/15
кебепхана/10
келімдәрі/15
келімпаз/12
кесте/15
кетозалар/11
кобжан/13
комиссариат/14
контактілі/15
костя/10
крахмал/12
күзекші/15
күмісай/11
күртікте/15
кәріқұлақ/14
көзайым/13
көзеуші/15
көлпал/12
көрнекі/15
лапароскопия/10
латыншылдар/11
лиқад/14
лян/13
лүпілде/15
мажази/10
майданшыл/12
малай/11
мамықтап/14
мастура/10
материализм/13
махмур/11
мағдырсыз/12
мақсаттылық/14
металлогенді/15
микроцикл/12
милләта/10
милықтан/13
минералсыздандыру/11
миқап/14
мутул/12
мухамор/11
мына/10
мырзақамақ/14
міндеттемелердың/13
мүңсі/15
мұғдар/11
мәнсұх/14
найлаж/12
натурашы/10
национализациялан/13
негізге/15
нитрозбояғыштар/11
нквд/14
нұрнияз/12
нәршырын/13
озалда/10
омброфоттар/11
оп/14,24
орындалуын/13
основьяненко/10
отаршыл/12
оқшырай/11
памдат/14
парфюмерия/15
патриархалды/10
персонал/12
перғауын/13
примат/14
пустула/10
пышыр/11
пәткерде/15
реалшыл/12
реглан/13
ретикулоцит/14
ринги/10
сабырсу/11
салқындап/14
самғал/12
сантехника/10
сапытған/13
сарымай/11
саяхат/14
секілді/15
селитра/10
сил/12
силин/13
сипаттамалар/11
солтұстық/14
спартакиада/10
субвенциялардың/13
суыртпақтау/11
сыбырлат/14
сылтаушыл/12
сықақта/10
сілбі/15,25
сүшүрді/15
сұрай/11
сөзжұмбақ/14
табандаған/13
талғамал/12
тамызғы/10
тамыр/11
таржих/14
тасборан/13
таяну/11
тақбезе/15
тақымды/10
таңдағыш/14
таһлил/12
тербөртпе/15
тобатай/11
тойпаң/13
толқымалы/10
толқыс/14
томпақтал/12
тоңғақ/14
трахомотоз/12
триатлон/13
трио/10
тувшеді/15
туылу/11
тырнас/14
тығынғыз/12
түбүтледі/15
түстүйе/15
тұзлатты/10
тұйғын/13
тұрлаусыздық/14
тұқшыңдау/11
тұқылданғыз/12
тәһиә/15
умбра/10
фанерогам/13
филе/15
филиал/12
франческа/10
футух/14
хубал/12
худбин/13
чапыша/10
шайғыздыр/11
шарж/12
шарон/13
шарық/14
шаңқи/10
шекүрге/15
шопенгауэр/11
шоқал/12
шылаушын/13
шүйгінді/15
шұбарши/10
шұхрат/14
ынтымақшыл/12
ыссылай/11
эднан/13
электротермия/15
эмоция/10
ічтеме/15
іңкал/12
ғиш/14
қабылдин/13
қабықты/10
қайратшыл/12
қалалану/11
қалқыңды/10
қамиян/13
қаптал/12
қарағыш/14
қарғұй/11
қасаба/10
қатаңдан/13
қатил/12
қибла/10
қираңдат/14
қияқсыз/12
қиқақтау/11
қиқын/13
қолұшды/10
қорғауынсыз/12
қосжелпейлі/15
қосын/13
қояшақ/14
қоқай/11
қуыңқыра/10
қызғылықсыз/12
қырылдаған/13
қырқасындау/11
қыфтұ/10
қыяғағ/14
құж/12
құрсым/13
құрығанда/10
құтғармай/11
үлге/15
үраншыл/12
ұмтылт/14
ұстағанда/10
ұшқалақтан/13
әбдірасұл/12
әділімсі/15
әнжамтабу/11
әреке/15
өгүлді/15
өркендеуіне/15
